Utah statutes.
78B-13-202.   Exclusive, continuing jurisdiction.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 78B-13-204, a court of this state
that has made a child custody determination consistent with Section 78B-13-201
or 78B-13-203 has exclusive, continuing jurisdiction over the determination
until:
(a)  a court of this state determines that neither the child, the child and
one parent, nor the child and a person acting as a parent have a significant
connection with this state and that substantial evidence is no longer
available in this state concerning the child's care, protection, training, and
personal relationships; or
(b)  a court of this state or a court of another state determines that neither
the child, nor a parent, nor any person acting as a parent presently resides
in this state.
(2)  A court of this state that has exclusive, continuing jurisdiction under
this section may decline to exercise its jurisdiction if the court determines
that it is an inconvenient forum under Section 78B-13-207.
(3)  A court of this state that has made a child custody determination and
does not have exclusive, continuing jurisdiction under this section may modify
that determination only if it has jurisdiction to make an initial
determination under Section 78B-13-201.
